Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
611

COUNSEL
AND OTHER SERVICES FOR INDIGENT

DEFENDANTS

REPEALED. L 1971, c 185, §2; L Sp 1981
1st, c 22, §3.

Cross References

For present provisions, see chapter 802.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next